Alabama, session 2026rs, HB334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 16-25-7, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§16-25-7
(a) All persons now employed on a full-time basis in an
Page 1

(a) All persons now employed on a full-time basis in an
HB334 INTRODUCED
administrative or clerical capacity by the Alabama High School
Athletic Association may become members of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Alabama within 90 days after October 1,
1967, subject to such rules and regulations as may be
promulgated by the Board of Control of the Teachers'
Retirement System of Alabama. Any person hereafter employed in
an administrative or clerical capacity by the Alabama High
School Athletic Association shall be deemed to be a "teacher"
as defined in Section 16-25-1 and shall be entitled to the
benefits thereof. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
section and other sections of the Teachers' Retirement System
law, it is provided that the The Alabama High School Athletic
Association shall pay to the retirement system Teachers'
Retirement System of Alabama the employer cost for coverage of
its employees who began participating in the retirement system
before October 1, 2026, such cost to. The employer cost shall
be determined by an actuary employed by the Board of Control
and under rules and regulations established by said the board.
(b) Any person now employed by the Alabama High School
Athletic Association and participating in the Teachers'
Retirement System of Alabama pursuant to as set out in
subsection (a) of this section shall be entitled to may
receive credit for all service as a "teacher" or as an
employee of the Alabama High School Athletic Association
rendered by him or her prior to October 1, 1967; provided,
that a sum equal to the total contributions which he or she
would have made as a member during the period of such
employment plus regular interest at four percent is paid
Page 2

employment plus regular interest at four percent is paid
HB334 INTRODUCED
within 90 days after October 1, 1967.
(c) No employee of the Alabama High School Athletic
Association hired on or after October 1, 2026, may participate
in the Teacher's Retirement System of Alabama based upon that
employment."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3